Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-317 Voidable preferences and liens.

(a)(1) A preference is a transfer of any of the property
of an insurer to or for the benefit of a creditor, for or on account of an
antecedent debt, made or suffered by the insurer within one year before the filing
of a successful petition for liquidation under this article, the effect of
which transfer may be to enable the creditor to obtain a greater percentage of
this debt than another creditor of the same class would receive. If a
liquidation order is entered while the insurer is already subject to a
rehabilitation order, then such transfers shall be deemed preferences if made
or suffered within one year before the filing of the successful petition for
rehabilitation, or within two years before the filing of the successful
petition for liquidation, whichever time is shorter.

(2) Any preference may be avoided by the liquidator
if:

(A) The insurer was insolvent at the time of
the transfer;

(B) The transfer was made within four months
before the filing of the petition;

(C) The creditor receiving it or to be
benefited thereby or the creditor's agent acting with reference thereto had, at
the time when the transfer was made, reasonable cause to believe that the
insurer was insolvent or was about to become insolvent; or

(D) The creditor receiving it was an officer,
or any employee or attorney or other person who was in fact in a position of
comparable influence in the insurer to an officer whether or not the creditor
held such position, or any shareholder holding directly or indirectly more than
five per centum of any class of any equity security issued by the insurer, or
any other person, firm, corporation, association, or aggregation of persons
with whom the insurer did not deal at arm's length.

(3) Where the preference is voidable, the liquidator
may recover the property or, if it has been converted, its value from any
person who has received or converted the property, except where a bona fide
purchaser or lienor has given less than fair equivalent value, the liquidator
shall have a lien upon the property to the extent of the consideration actually
given by the liquidator. Where a preference by way of lien or security title
is voidable, the court may on due notice order the lien or title to be
preserved for the benefit of the estate, in which event the lien or title shall
pass to the liquidator.

(b)(1) A transfer of property other than real property
shall be deemed to be made or suffered when it becomes so far perfected that no
subsequent lien obtainable by legal or equitable proceedings on a simple
contract could become superior to the rights of the transferee.

(2) A transfer of real property shall be deemed to be
made or suffered when it becomes so far perfected that no subsequent bona fide
purchaser from the insurer could obtain rights superior to the rights of the
transferee.

(3) A transfer which creates an equitable lien shall
not be deemed to be perfected if there are available means by which a legal
lien could be created.

(4) A transfer not perfected prior to the filing of a
petition for liquidation shall be deemed to be made immediately before the
filing of the successful petition.

(5) The provisions of this subsection apply whether
or not there are or were creditors who might have obtained liens or persons who
might have become bona fide purchasers.

(c)(1) A lien obtainable by legal or equitable
proceedings upon a simple contract is one arising in the ordinary course of
such proceedings upon the entry of docketing of a judgment or decree, or upon
attachment, garnishment, execution, or like process, whether before, upon, or
after judgment or decree and whether before or upon levy. It does not include
liens which under applicable law are given a special priority over other liens
which are prior in time.

(2) A lien obtainable by legal or equitable
proceedings could become superior to the rights of a transferee, or a purchaser
could obtain rights superior to the rights of a transferee within the meaning
of subsection (b), if such consequences would follow only from the lien or
purchase itself, or from the lien or purchase followed by any step wholly
within the control of the respective lien holder or purchaser, with or without
the aid of ministerial action by public officials. Such a lien could not, however,
become superior and such a purchase could not create superior rights for the
purpose of subsection (b) through any acts subsequent to the obtaining of such
a lien or subsequent to such a purchase which require the agreement or
concurrence of any third party or which require any further judicial action or
ruling.

(d) A transfer of property for or on account
of a new and contemporaneous consideration which is deemed under subsection (b)
to be made or suffered after the transfer because of delay in perfecting it
does not thereby become a transfer for or on account of an antecedent debt if
any acts required by the applicable law to be performed in order to perfect the
transfer as against liens or bona fide purchaser's rights are performed within
twenty-one days or any period expressly allowed by the law, whichever is less.
A transfer to secure a future loan, if such a loan is actually made, or a
transfer which becomes security for a future loan, shall have the same effect
as a transfer for or on account of a new and contemporaneous consideration.

(e) If any lien deemed voidable under
subsection (a)(2) has been dissolved by the furnishing of a bond or other
obligation, the surety on which has been indemnified directly or indirectly by
the transfer of or the creation of a lien upon any property of an insurer
before the filing of a petition under this article which results in a
liquidation order, the indemnifying transfer or lien shall also be deemed
voidable.

(f) The property affected by any lien deemed
voidable under subsections (a) and (e) shall be discharged from such lien, and
that property and any of the indemnifying property transferred to or for the
benefit of a surety shall pass to the liquidator, except that the court may on
due notice order any such lien to be preserved for the benefit of the estate
and the court may direct that such conveyance be executed as may be proper or
adequate to evidence the title of the liquidator.

(g) The circuit court of the first judicial
circuit shall have summary jurisdiction of any proceeding by the liquidator to
hear and determine the rights of any parties under this section. Reasonable
notice of any hearing in the proceeding shall be given to all parties in
interest, including the obligee of a releasing bond or other like obligation.
Where an order is entered for the recovery of indemnifying property in kind or
for the avoidance of an indemnifying lien, the court, upon application of any
party in interest, shall in the same proceeding ascertain the value of the
property or lien, and if the value is less than the amount for which the
property is indemnified or than the amount of the lien, the transferee or lien
holder may elect to retain the property or lien upon payment of its value, as
ascertained by the court, to the liquidator, within such reasonable times as
the court shall fix.

(h) The liability of a surety under a
releasing bond or other like obligation shall be discharged to the extent of
the value of the indemnifying property recovered or the indemnifying lien
nullified and avoided by the liquidator, or where the property is retained
under subsection (g) to the extent of the amount paid to the liquidator.

(i) If a creditor has been preferred, and
afterward in good faith gives the insurer further credit without security of
any kind, for property which becomes a part of the insurer's estate, the amount
of the new credit remaining unpaid at the time of the petition may be set off
against the preference which would otherwise be recoverable from the creditor.

(j) If an insurer shall, directly or
indirectly, within four months before the filing of a successful petition for
liquidation under this article, or at any time in contemplation of a proceeding
to liquidate it, pay money or transfer property to an attorney-at-law for
services rendered or to be rendered, the transaction may be examined by the
court on its own motion or shall be examined by the court on petition of the
liquidator and shall be held valid only to the extent of a reasonable amount to
be determined by the court, and the excess may be recovered by the liquidator
for the benefit of the estate provided that where the attorney is in a position
of influence in the insurer or an affiliate thereof, payment of any money or
the transfer of any property to the attorney-at-law for services rendered or to
be rendered shall be governed by subsection (a)(2)(D).

(k)(1) Every officer, manager, employee, shareholder,
member, subscriber, attorney, or any other person acting on behalf of the
insurer who knowingly participates in giving any preference when such person
has reasonable cause to believe the insurer is or is about to become insolvent
at the time of the preference shall be personally liable to the liquidator for
the amount of the preference. It is permissible to infer that there is
reasonable cause to so believe if the transfer was made within four months
before the date of filing of this successful petition for liquidation.

(2) Every person receiving any property from the
insurer or the benefit thereof as a preference voidable under subsection (a)
shall be personally liable therefor and shall be bound to account to the
liquidator.

(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prejudice any
other claim by the liquidator against any person. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am
L 2004, c 122, §69]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next